uz.aff
SFX Y 0 ishishimikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishishiku . 
SFX Y 0 ishishimizmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishishimizdir . 
SFX Y 0 ishishimizda . 
SFX Y 0 ishishimizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishishimizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishishimizku . 
SFX Y 0 ishishingizmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishishingizdir . 
SFX Y 0 ishishingizda . 
SFX Y 0 ishishingizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishishingizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishishingizku . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimdir . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimdirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimku . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingdir . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingdirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingku . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimi . 
SFX Y 0 dirishidir . 
SFX Y 0 dirishida . 
SFX Y 0 dirishidirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirishiku . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimizmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimizdir . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimizda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimizku . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingizmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingizdir . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingizda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingizku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimdir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimdirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingdir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingdirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimi . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishidir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishida . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishidirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishiku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimizmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimizdir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimizda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimizku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingizmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingizdir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingizda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingizdirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingizmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingizku . 
SFX Y 0 inishimni . 
SFX Y 0 inishimning . 
SFX Y 0 inishimga . 
SFX Y 0 inishimdan . 
SFX Y 0 inishimda . 
SFX Y 0 inishingni . 
SFX Y 0 inishingning . 
SFX Y 0 inishingga . 
SFX Y 0 inishingdan . 
SFX Y 0 inishingda . 
SFX Y 0 inishini . 
SFX Y 0 inishining . 
SFX Y 0 inishiga . 
SFX Y 0 inishidan . 
SFX Y 0 inishida . 
SFX Y 0 inishimizni . 
SFX Y 0 inishimizning . 
SFX Y 0 inishimizga . 
SFX Y 0 inishimizdan . 
SFX Y 0 inishimizda . 
SFX Y 0 inishingizni . 
SFX Y 0 inishingizning . 
SFX Y 0 inishingizga . 
SFX Y 0 inishingizdan . 
SFX Y 0 inishingizda . 
SFX Y 0 ishishimni . 
SFX Y 0 ishishimning . 
SFX Y 0 ishishimga . 
SFX Y 0 ishishimdan . 
SFX Y 0 ishishimda . 
SFX Y 0 ishishingni . 
SFX Y 0 ishishingning . 
SFX Y 0 ishishingga . 
SFX Y 0 ishishingdan . 
SFX Y 0 ishishingda . 
SFX Y 0 ishishini . 
SFX Y 0 ishishining . 
SFX Y 0 ishishiga . 
SFX Y 0 ishishidan . 
SFX Y 0 ishishida . 
SFX Y 0 ishishimizni . 
SFX Y 0 ishishimizning . 
SFX Y 0 ishishimizga . 
SFX Y 0 ishishimizdan . 
SFX Y 0 ishishimizda . 
SFX Y 0 ishishingizni . 
SFX Y 0 ishishingizning . 
SFX Y 0 ishishingizga . 
SFX Y 0 ishishingizdan . 
SFX Y 0 ishishingizda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimni . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimning . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimga . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingni . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingning . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingga . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishini . 
SFX Y 0 dirishining . 
SFX Y 0 dirishiga . 
SFX Y 0 dirishidan . 
SFX Y 0 dirishida . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimizni . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimizning . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimizga . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimizdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirishimizda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingizni . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingizning . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingizga . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingizdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirishingizda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimni . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimning . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimga . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingni . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingning . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingga . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishini . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishining . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishiga . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishidan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishida . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimizni . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimizning . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimizga . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimizdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishimizda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingizni . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingizning . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingizga . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingizdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishingizda . 
SFX Y 0 inishni . 
SFX Y 0 inishning . 
SFX Y 0 inishga . 
SFX Y 0 inishdan . 
SFX Y 0 inishda . 
SFX Y 0 ishishni . 
SFX Y 0 ishishning . 
SFX Y 0 ishishga . 
SFX Y 0 ishishdan . 
SFX Y 0 ishishda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishni . 
SFX Y 0 dirishning . 
SFX Y 0 dirishga . 
SFX Y 0 dirishdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirishda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishni . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishning . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishga . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishdan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishda . 
SFX Y 0 inishnimi . 
SFX Y 0 inishnidir . 
SFX Y 0 inishnida . 
SFX Y 0 inishnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 inishnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 inishniku . 
SFX Y 0 inishgami . 
SFX Y 0 inishgadir . 
SFX Y 0 inishgada . 
SFX Y 0 inishgadirda . 
SFX Y 0 inishgamikan . 
SFX Y 0 inishgaku . 
SFX Y 0 inishdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 inishdandir . 
SFX Y 0 inishdanda . 
SFX Y 0 inishdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 inishdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inishdanku . 
SFX Y 0 inishdami . 
SFX Y 0 inishdadir . 
SFX Y 0 inishdada . 
SFX Y 0 inishdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 inishdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 inishdaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishishnimi . 
SFX Y 0 ishishnidir . 
SFX Y 0 ishishnida . 
SFX Y 0 ishishnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishishnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishishniku . 
SFX Y 0 ishishgami . 
SFX Y 0 ishishgadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishishgada . 
SFX Y 0 ishishgadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishishgamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishishgaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishishdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishishdandir . 
SFX Y 0 ishishdanda . 
SFX Y 0 ishishdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishishdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishishdanku . 
SFX Y 0 ishishdami . 
SFX Y 0 ishishdadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishishdada . 
SFX Y 0 ishishdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishishdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishishdaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirishnimi . 
SFX Y 0 dirishnidir . 
SFX Y 0 dirishnida . 
SFX Y 0 dirishnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirishniku . 
SFX Y 0 dirishgami . 
SFX Y 0 dirishgadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirishgada . 
SFX Y 0 dirishgadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishgamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirishgaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirishdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirishdandir . 
SFX Y 0 dirishdanda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirishdanku . 
SFX Y 0 dirishdami . 
SFX Y 0 dirishdadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirishdada . 
SFX Y 0 dirishdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirishdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirishdaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishnimi . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishnidir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishnida . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishniku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishgami . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishgadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishgada . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishgadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishgamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishgaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishdandir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishdanda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishdanku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishdami . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishdadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishdada . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtirishdaku . 
SFX Y 0 inishimnimi . 
SFX Y 0 inishimnidir . 
SFX Y 0 inishimnida . 
SFX Y 0 inishimnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 inishimnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 inishimniku . 
SFX Y 0 inishimgami . 
SFX Y 0 inishimgadir . 
SFX Y 0 inishimgada . 
SFX Y 0 inishimgadirda . 
SFX Y 0 inishimgamikan . 
SFX Y 0 inishimgaku . 
SFX Y 0 inishimdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 inishimdandir . 
SFX Y 0 inishimdanda . 
SFX Y 0 inishimdandirda . 
SFX Y 0 inishimdanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inishimdanku . 
SFX Y 0 inishimdami . 
SFX Y 0 inishimdadir . 
SFX Y 0 inishimdada . 
SFX Y 0 inishimdadirda . 
SFX Y 0 inishimdamikan . 
SFX Y 0 inishimdaku . 
SFX Y 0 inishingnimi . 
SFX Y 0 inishingnidir . 
SFX Y 0 inishingnida . 
SFX Y 0 inishingnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 inishingnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 inishingniku . 
SFX Y 0 inishinggami . 
SFX Y 0 inishinggadir . 
SFX Y 0 inishinggada . 
SFX Y 0 inishinggadirda . 
SFX Y 0 inishinggamikan . 
SFX Y 0 inishinggaku . 
SFX Y 0 inishingdanmi . 
SFX Y 0 inishingdandir . 
SFX Y 0 inishingdanda . 
