uz.dic
avomlash/Y
adiplat/Y
ajrimlash/Y
aylanish/Y
aytish/Y
aldan/Y
almashtirgiz/Y
angray/Y
arabchalash/Y
arittir/Y
archit/Y
astalash/Y
axtarin/Y
achchiqlash/Y
badtarlar/Y
baqirish/Y
barglat/Y
battarlash/Y
beburdlantir/Y
bezatil/Y
bezovtalantir/Y
belgilan/Y
berkinish/Y
besarlan/Y
betoqatlan/Y
bidirlash/Y
bilvol/Y
bil/Y
birodarlash/Y
bichtiril/Y
boqqiz/Y
boplash/Y
botin/Y
boshqartir/Y
bo’g’ilish/Y
bo’g’riq/Y
bo’zlash/Y
bo’kirish/Y
bukchay/Y
bo’ldir/Y
bural/Y
buriltir/Y
bo’rsit/Y
butlan/Y
bo’shatqiz/Y
bo’yaltir/Y
vajillash/Y
vang’illat/Y
va’dalash/Y
voldirash/Y
galdirash/Y
gaplashayoz/Y
gijbashlat/Y
gruppalashtir/Y
go’llash/Y
gurpanglash/Y
dadillantiril/Y
dalillantir/Y
darmonlan/Y
dedirtir/Y
didlan/Y
dimiqtir/Y
dovdirat/Y
duvillat/Y
do’laytir/Y
dupurlat/Y
yovvoyilash/Y
yog’ilaver/Y
yodlayver/Y
yozlash/Y
yoqalan/Y
yolg’izlash/Y
yelpin/Y
yonboshlash/Y
yopinish/Y
yoritil/Y
yetizaver/Y
yotqizil/Y
yechish/Y
jabrlantir/Y
jamlattir/Y
jivirlash/Y
jildirash/Y
jipslash/Y
jonlantir/Y
jo’nash/Y
zaiflashtir/Y
zardalan/Y
zidlashtir/Y
zichlash/Y
zumlat/Y
ijirg’an/Y
yig’dir/Y
iydir/Y
yiriklashtir/Y
ikkilantir/Y
ildamlan/Y
ilin/Y
ingichkalash/Y
injit/Y
intiltir/Y
irjayish/Y
iskat/Y
istehzolan/Y
yo’y/Y
yo’naltir/Y
ifodalan/Y
ichir/Y
ishqal/Y
ishoralan/Y
kakillash/Y
kambag’allan/Y
kartalashtir/Y
kezin/Y
kel/Y
kepaklan/Y
keskirlan/Y
kechin/Y
kizaklat/Y
kiraver/Y
kirtay/Y
koagulyatsiyalashtir/Y
konspektlashtiril/Y
kuzatil/Y
ko’klat/Y
ko’mish/Y
ko’payt/Y
kurattir/Y
kurkillat/Y
kutil/Y
ko’chirtir/Y
qabzit/Y
qag’illash/Y
qaz/Y
qaynash/Y
qaychilat/Y
qalashtir/Y
qamal/Y
qanoatsizlan/Y
qarg’an/Y
qasdlash/Y
qatorlash/Y
qashshoqlan/Y
qizdiril/Y
qiyinlash/Y
qiynash/Y
qilish/Y
qimirlash/Y
qirin/Y
qisimlat/Y
qitmirlan/Y
qlat/Y
qol/Y
qo’qqay/Y
qo’nqay/Y
qo’riqlan/Y
qurollantiril/Y
qutqar/Y
qo’shnilash/Y
laqillat/Y
liqillat/Y
loylantir/Y
lulay/Y
majruhlan/Y
maynshtir/Y
mahalliylashtir/Y
ma’rioatlantir/Y
mijg’ish/Y
mingash/Y
mkyovlat/Y
moslashtir/Y
mug’aytirish/Y
mo’ysafidlash/Y
mo’loqlan/Y
musobaqalash/Y
muyassarlan/Y
nasoslat/Y
nizolash/Y
nishonlantir/Y
normalan/Y
nchikish/Y
ovlat/Y
og’/Y
oyoqlantir/Y
ozodalash/Y
oqlattir/Y
olislan/Y
olmoq-sot/Y
ontar/Y
orlan/Y
osonlashtiril/Y
ohholash/Y
oshat/Y
palag’dalan/Y
partillat/Y
peshlat/Y
pichrat/Y
pllittiril/Y
porsillat/Y
pufpuflash/Y
rag’batlan/Y
randalat/Y
remontlat/Y
sabrsizlan/Y
saylattir/Y
sanattir/Y
saranglash/Y
sahnalashtir/Y
sekinlat/Y
septir/Y
sidiril/Y
siypalash/Y
simvollashtir/Y
sipiq/Y
sirtmoqlan/Y
sovurish/Y
soddalashtir/Y
sollantir/Y
stabillashtir/Y
sug’o’rtir/Y
so’zlash/Y
so’ktir/Y
so’lit/Y
so’rat/Y
surinish/Y
so’rray/Y
suyuqlan/Y
sechrat/Y
tajassumlan/Y
takomillan/Y
taqiqlat/Y
talpin/Y
tanbehlan/Y
tannszlash/Y
taranglat/Y
tasdiqlash/Y
tahqiqlan/Y
tashlash/Y
tebranish/Y
tejash/Y
tekshiril/Y
tepalat/Y
teril/Y
tig’izlat/Y
tiyish/Y
tiktir/Y
tildir/Y
timirskilash/Y
tinish/Y
tiral/Y
tirkat/Y
tisar/Y
tittir/Y
tovsil/Y
toylash/Y
tomiz/Y
topishtir/Y
torlan/Y
toshir/Y
tug’il/Y
tuzatil/Y
tuzlat/Y
to’yin/Y
to’qinish/Y
tulat/Y
to’ldiril/Y
to’mtoqlan/Y
tunqot/Y
to’purtir/Y
turtil/Y
tutamlash/Y
tut/Y
tushirtir/Y
uvalat/Y
o’g’irlash/Y
uzan/Y
uziltir/Y
uyg’oqlan/Y
o’yil/Y
o’ynab-o’s/Y
o’ksit/Y
o’qraytir/Y
uldiril/Y
o’lchanil/Y
o’ngaril/Y
o’pirtir/Y
o’rat/Y
o’rdirt/Y
o’rlat/Y
o’rtin/Y
o’stirgiz/Y
o’tkazil/Y
o’tqizish/Y
ufur/Y
o’chirin/Y
uchovlash/Y
ushlashtir/Y
falajlan/Y
ftkaz/Y
xafalash/Y
xiralan/Y
xolilan/Y
xoxolash/Y
xo’rlan/Y
xo’shlash/Y
chaiil/Y
chaynaltir/Y
chaqish/Y
chaldirtir/Y
chalpish/Y
chapillat/Y
charchat/Y
chekil/Y
chert/Y
chig’illat/Y
chiz/Y
chiqarish/Y
chim/Y
chiritish/Y
chirsillat/Y
chopish/Y
chuval/Y
cho’g’lantir/Y
chuy/Y
cho’qip/Y
chuldirash/Y
churqillash/Y
chuchptil/Y
shaddodlan/Y
shalpay/Y
shatillat/Y
shikastlan/Y
shiltalan/Y
shing’irlat/Y
shifolan/Y
shodalan/Y
shoshiltir/Y
shudgorlan/Y
eboril/Y
eganalash/Y
egovlash/Y
ezdirtir/Y
ekil/Y
ektirtir/Y
elang’ochlat/Y
elektrifikatsiyalan/Y
ellig’lan/Y
eltoqlan/Y
emdir/Y
emran/Y
eplol/Y
esankirat/Y
etiktir/Y
yumuqlan/Y
yuraver/Y
yuttir/Y
yanchtir/Y
yarog’lantir/Y
yashirin/Y
